Alaska statutes. Title 12. Code of Criminal Procedure.
Chapter 37. Interceptions and Access to Communications.

Cross references. —

For provisions regarding communications, eavesdropping, and wiretapping, see AS

42.20.300

—

42.20.390

.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter on the bill (HB 187) that became
ch. 61, SLA 1993, which enacted this chapter, see 1993 House Journal 488 — 489.